Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 36

Equal Powers and Authority Act

65-36-101. Short title.

The title of this chapter is, and may be cited as the “Electric Utility Comprehensive Equal Power and Authority Act of 1997.”

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 10 provided that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change the requirements of title 7, chapter 82, part 8 with respect to the merger or acquisition of any water, sewer, or gas system of a utility district with or by a municipal electric utility or electric cooperative. Additionally, this chapter shall not be construed to authorize any municipal electric utility or elective cooperative to provide a service for which a license, certification or registration is required pursuant to title 62, chapter 32, part 3, or operate a cable system as defined in § 7-59-201(2) for the provisions of cable service, to provide pager services, or to operate as an internet service provider.

65-36-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Electric cooperative” means an electric cooperative or electric membership corporation, whether organized or operating under chapter 25 of this title or similar statutes of any other state, which, as of June 19, 1997, distributes electric power purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority; and

“Municipal utility” and “municipal electric utility” means any governmental entity as defined in § 29-20-102, having a system for the distribution of electricity, whether operated under the authority of a board of the governmental entity, a department of the governmental entity or under the authority of a board created pursuant to the Tennessee Municipal Electric Plant Law, compiled in title 7, chapter 52, or by the authority of any other public or private act of the general assembly or pursuant to the charter of a municipality, and that operates an electric generation or distribution system which, as of June 19, 1997, distributes electricity purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority and also includes any municipality, county or other political subdivision of another state, whether operated under a board or as a county or municipal department, which, as of June 19, 1997, distributes electricity purchased from the Tennessee Valley authority.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 2.

65-36-103. Legislative findings.

The general assembly hereby finds and determines that participating in interlocal agreements by electric cooperatives and municipal utilities, as authorized by this chapter, provides a mutual benefit by reducing the expense of operations of municipal utilities and electric cooperatives and, as a result, reduces the cost of electricity for the citizens of this state. Accordingly, the general assembly hereby finds that all contributions of financial and administrative resources and associated costs and expenses that are made by a municipal utility pursuant to an interlocal agreement as authorized by this chapter, are made for a public and governmental purpose, and that all such contributions benefit the contributing municipal utilities.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 3.

65-36-104. Interlocal cooperation agreements authorized.

Every municipal electric utility and every electric cooperative are hereby authorized to enter into and to fulfill the terms of interlocal cooperation agreements under the authority of title 12, chapter 9, whether or not the parties of such agreements share equal powers with respect to the subject matter of such agreements. For the purpose of entering into agreements authorized under this chapter or entering into an interlocal agreement under title 12, chapter 9, municipal utilities and electric cooperatives are authorized to enter into interlocal agreements, as if each electric cooperative were a “public agency” for the purposes of title 12, chapter 9.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 4.

65-36-105. Use of surplus funds.

Every municipal electric utility and every electric cooperative are hereby authorized to use surplus revenues in connection with the exercise of any power or authority they may exercise under any law; provided, that the exercise of that power or authority is not a violation of the terms and conditions of a wholesale power contract between the Tennessee Valley authority and the respective municipal electric utility or electric cooperative and is not a violation of or otherwise prohibited by the terms and conditions of any covenants in any outstanding revenue bonds of the municipal electric utility or loan covenant of the electric cooperative, as may be applicable.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 5.

65-36-106. Telephone, telegraph and telecommunications services.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter or other law to the contrary, if the exercise of power or authority granted by this chapter involves any system, plant, or equipment for the provision of telephone, telegraph, telecommunications services or any other like system, plant, or equipment, such exercise, whether by a municipal electric system, an electric cooperative or jointly, shall not be subject to this chapter but instead shall be subject to title 7, chapter 52, as amended. With respect to telephone, telegraph, or telecommunications services, electric cooperatives shall be subject to regulation by the Tennessee public utility commission to the same extent as municipal electric utilities under title 7, chapter 52.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 6; 2017, ch. 94, § 71.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “Tennessee public utility commission” for “Tennessee regulatory authority”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 94, § 83. April 4, 2017.

65-36-107. Competitive consequences of agreement.

In the exercise of their respective powers and authority, jointly and severally, under interlocal cooperation agreements entered into under the authority of this chapter and title 12, chapter 9, electric cooperatives and municipal utilities and any separate entity or body created under § 12-9-104(c), may exercise such powers and authority regardless of the competitive consequences thereof.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, § 7.

65-36-108. Construction with other regulatory statutes.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to be an implied repeal of the service area limitations established in § 6-51-112 or chapter 34 of this title.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change the requirements of title 7, chapter 82, with respect to the merger or acquisition of any water, sewer, or gas system of a utility district with or by a municipal electric utility or electric cooperative. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to authorize any municipal electric utility or electric cooperative to provide a service for which a license, certification or registration is required pursuant to title 62, chapter 32, part 3, or operate a cable system as defined by § 7-59-201 for the provision of cable service, to provide pager services, or to operate as an internet service provider.

Acts 1997, ch. 520, §§ 8, 10.